Utah statutes.
70A-2a-304.   Subsequent lease of goods by lessor.
(1)  Subject to Section 70A-2a-303, a subsequent lessee from a lessor of goods
under an existing lease contract obtains, to the extent of the leasehold
interest transferred, the leasehold interest in the goods that the lessor had
or had power to transfer, and except as provided in Subsection (2) and
Subsection 70A-2a-527(4), takes subject to the existing lease contract.  A
lessor with voidable title has power to transfer a good leasehold interest to
a good faith subsequent lessee for value, but only to the extent set forth in
the preceding sentence.   If goods have been delivered under a transaction of
purchase, the lessor has that power even though:
(a)  the lessor's transferor was deceived as to the identity of the lessor;
(b)  the delivery was in exchange for a check which is later dishonored;
(c)  it was agreed that the transaction was to be a "cash sale;" or
(d)  the delivery was procured through fraud punishable as larcenous under the
criminal law.
(2)  A subsequent lessee in the ordinary course of business from a lessor who
is a merchant dealing in goods of that kind to whom the goods were entrusted
by the existing lessee of that lessor before the interest of the subsequent
lessee became enforceable against the lessor obtains, to the extent of the
leasehold interest transferred, all of that lessor's and the existing lessee's
rights to the goods, and takes free of the existing lease contract.
(3)  A subsequent lessee from the lessor of goods that are subject to an
existing lease contract and are covered by a certificate of title issued under
a statute of this state or of another jurisdiction takes no greater rights
than those provided both by this section and by the certificate of title
statute.
